Utah statutes.
53-7-105.   State fire marshal, deputies, and investigators -- Status of law
enforcement officers -- Inclusion in Public Safety Retirement -- Training.
(1)  The state fire marshal, his deputies, and investigators, for the purpose
of enforcing and investigating violations of fire related statutes and
ordinances, have the status of law enforcement officers.
(2)  Inclusion under Title 49, Chapter 14, Public Safety Contributory
Retirement Act, or Title 49, Chapter 15, Public Safety Noncontributory
Retirement Act, is not authorized by Subsection (1) except as provided in
those chapters.
(3)  The commissioner, with the concurrence of the Peace Officer Standards and
Training Advisory Board may require peace officer standards and training for
the state fire marshal, his deputies, and investigators.
